Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 6 Beneficiaries and Beneficial Rights

386A.6-010.
Beneficial interest.

A beneficial interest in a statutory trust is personal property regardless of the nature of the property of the trust.

A beneficial interest in a statutory trust is not an interest in specific property of the statutory trust.

A beneficial interest in a statutory trust is freely transferable.

Any limitations upon transfer of a beneficial interest set forth in the governing instrument shall be void if the same person is the sole trustee and sole beneficial owner.

A beneficial owner does not have a preemptive right to subscribe to any additional issue of beneficial interests or any other interest of a statutory trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 45, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.6-020.
Voting or consent by beneficial owners.

The vote of all beneficial owners is required for:

The amendment of the governing instrument;

Compromise of a beneficial owner’s obligation to make a contribution to the statutory trust;

The conversion of the statutory trust;

The merger of the statutory trust;

The extension of the term of the statutory trust beyond that provided for in the governing instrument; and

The dissolution of the statutory trust.

Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the beneficial owners act by a majority of the beneficial interests.

A beneficial owner may vote in person or by proxy, but if by proxy, the proxy must be contained in a signed record.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 46, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.6-030.
Contribution by beneficial owner.

A contribution of a beneficial owner to a statutory trust may be in cash, property, or services rendered or a promissory note or other obligation to contribute cash or property or to perform services. A person may become a beneficial owner of a statutory trust and may receive a beneficial interest in a statutory trust without making or being obligated to make a contribution to the trust.

An obligation of a beneficial owner to make a contribution, whether of cash, property, or services, to the statutory trust shall not be enforceable unless set forth in a writing signed by the beneficial owner.

Unless otherwise provided in a governing instrument, a beneficial owner shall be obligated to the statutory trust to perform any enforceable promise to contribute cash or property or to perform services, even if the beneficial owner is unable to perform because of death, disability, or other reason. If a beneficial owner does not make a required contribution of property or services, then the beneficial owner shall be obligated, at the option of the statutory trust, to contribute cash equal to that portion of value of the stated contribution that has not been made. This obligation is in addition to any other right, including the right to specific performance, that the trust has against the beneficial owner under the governing instrument or applicable law.

Unless otherwise provided in a governing instrument, an obligation of a beneficial owner to make a contribution may be compromised by the beneficial owners. Notwithstanding any compromise, a creditor of a statutory trust who extended credit or otherwise acted in reliance on an obligation after the beneficial owner executed a writing which reflects that obligation and before any such compromise is reached may enforce the original obligation.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 47, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 106, § 10, effective June 25, 2013.

386A.6-040.
Distribution to beneficial owner.

Any distribution by a statutory trust before dissolution shall be made in proportion to the beneficial interests.

When a beneficial owner becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the trust’s indebtedness to a beneficial owner shall be at parity with the trust’s indebtedness to its general creditors except to the extent subordinated by agreement.

When a beneficial owner associated with a series becomes entitled to a distribution, the series’s indebtedness to a beneficial owner shall be at parity with the series’s indebtedness to its general creditors except as subordinated by agreement.

Unless otherwise provided in a governing instrument:

A beneficial owner, regardless of the nature of the beneficial owner’s contribution, shall not have a right to demand and receive a distribution in any form other than cash; and

A beneficial owner shall not be compelled to accept a distribution of any asset in kind to the extent that the percentage of the asset distributed to the beneficial owner exceeds the percentage that the beneficial owner would have shared in cash distribution equal to the value of the property at the time of distribution.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 48, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 106, § 11, effective June 25, 2013.

386A.6-050.
Redemption of beneficial interest.

On the terms set forth in the governing instrument, a statutory trust may acquire, by purchase, redemption, or otherwise, any beneficial interest in the trust, including a beneficial interest associated with a series thereof. A beneficial interest acquired under this section is canceled.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 49, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.6-060.
Charging order.

If a beneficial interest is not freely transferable by a beneficial owner so that the transferee has all rights of the transferor, this section provides the exclusive remedy by which the judgment creditor of a beneficial owner or a transferee of a beneficial owner may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s beneficial interest.

On application to a court of competent jurisdiction by a judgment creditor of a beneficial owner or a beneficial owner’s transferee, a court may charge the judgment debtor’s beneficial interest with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment. To the extent so charged, the judgment creditor shall have no right to participate in the management or to cause the dissolution of the statutory trust. The court may appoint a receiver of the share of the distributions due or to become due to the judgment debtor in respect of the beneficial interest and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries the judgment creditor might have made or which the circumstances of the case may require to give effect to the charging order.

A charging order constitutes a lien on and the right to receive distributions made with respect to the judgment debtor’s beneficial interest. A charging order does not of itself constitute an assignment of the beneficial interest.

The court may order a foreclosure upon the beneficial interest subject to the charging order at any time. The purchaser of the beneficial interest at the foreclosure sale shall have no right to participate in the management or to cause the dissolution of the statutory trust. Upon foreclosure the beneficial owner shall be dissociated from and cease to be a beneficial owner of the trust. At any time before foreclosure, the charged beneficial interest may be redeemed:

By the judgment debtor;

With property other than statutory trust property, by one (1) or more of the other beneficial owners; and

With statutory trust property, by the statutory trust with the consent of the trustees.

This section does not deprive a beneficial owner or a beneficial owner’s transferee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the beneficial interest.

The statutory trust is not a necessary party to an application for a charging order. Service of the charging order on a statutory trust may be made by the court granting the charging order or as the court should otherwise direct.

This section shall not apply to the enforcement of a judgment by a statutory trust against a beneficial owner of that trust.

This section shall apply to the issuance of a charging order against the beneficial interest of a beneficial owner or assignee of a beneficial owner of a foreign statutory trust.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 50, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 193, § 21, effective June 29, 2017.

386A.6-070.
Transaction with beneficial owner.

Subject to KRS

386A.5-070

, a beneficial owner may lend money to, borrow money from, act as a surety, guarantor, or endorser for, guarantee or assume an obligation of, provide collateral for, or do other business with the statutory trust and, subject to law other than this chapter, has the same rights and obligations with respect to those matters as a person that is not a beneficial owner.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 51, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.6-080.
Distributions.

Subject to any restriction in the governing instrument and the limitations in subsection (3) of this section, the trustees may authorize and the statutory trust may make distributions to its beneficial owners, including distributions to the beneficial owners associated with a series out of property of or associated with a series.

If there is no record date for determining the beneficial owners entitled to a distribution other than one involving a purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of beneficial interests in the statutory trust, it shall be the date the distribution is authorized.

No distribution shall be made if, after giving it effect:

The statutory trust would not be able to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of business;

The statutory trust’s total assets would be less than the sum of its total liabilities plus, unless the governing instrument permits otherwise, the amount that would be needed, if the statutory trust were to be dissolved at the time of the distribution, to satisfy the preferential rights upon dissolution of beneficial owners whose preferential rights are superior to those receiving the distribution; or

The distribution is impermissible under the governing instrument.

With respect to any distribution to the beneficial owners associated with a series out of property of or associated with a series, subsection (3) of this section shall be applied with respect to that series and not the statutory trust or any other series thereof.

The trustees may base a determination that a distribution is not prohibited under subsection (3) or (4) of this section either on financial statements prepared on the basis of accounting practices and principles that are reasonable in the circumstances or on a fair valuation or other method that is reasonable in the circumstances.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, for purposes of subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the effect of a distribution shall be measured:

In the case of distribution by purchase, redemption, or other acquisition of the statutory trust’s beneficial interests, as of the earlier of:

The date money or other property is transferred or debt incurred by the statutory trust; or

The date the beneficial owner ceases to be a beneficial owner with respect to the acquired beneficial interests;

In the case of any other distribution of indebtedness, as of the date the indebtedness is distributed; and

In all other cases, as of:

The date the distribution is authorized if the payment occurs within one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of authorization; or

The date the payment is made if it occurs more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date of authorization.

Indebtedness of a statutory trust or a series thereof, including indebtedness issued as a distribution, shall not be considered a liability for purposes of subsections (3) or (4) of this section if its terms provide that payment of principal and interest are made only if and to the extent that payment of a distribution to beneficial owners could then be made under this section. If the indebtedness is issued as a distribution, each payment of principal or interest shall be treated as a distribution, the effect of which is measured on the date the payment is actually made.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 52, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.6-090.
Liability for unlawful transactions.

A trustee who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of KRS

386A.6-080

shall be personally liable to the statutory trust for the amount of the distribution that exceeds what could have been distributed without violating KRS

386A.6-080

if it is established that the trustee did not perform his or her duties in compliance with KRS

386A.5-050

. In any proceeding commenced under this section, a trustee shall have all of the defenses ordinarily available to a trustee.

A trustee held liable under subsection (1) of this section for an unlawful distribution shall be entitled to contribution:

From every other trustee who could be held liable under subsection (1) of this section for the unlawful distribution; and

From each beneficial owner for the amount the beneficial owner accepted knowing the distribution was made in violation of KRS

386A.6-080

.

A proceeding under this section shall be barred unless it is commenced within two (2) years after the date on which the effect of the distribution was measured under KRS

386A.6-080

(6) and (7).

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 53, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.6-100.
Beneficial owner’s right to information.

A beneficial owner has the right to receive from the statutory trust or a trustee information relating to the affairs of a statutory trust which is reasonably related to the beneficial owner’s interest.

A governing instrument may impose reasonable limitations upon the use of any record of or information with respect to a statutory trust. Except as to limitations set forth in a governing instrument to which a beneficial owner requesting information has assented, the trust bears the burden of proof in demonstrating the reasonableness of any restrictions imposed.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 54, effective July 12, 2012.

386A.6-110.
Action by beneficial owner.

A beneficial owner may maintain a direct action against a statutory trust or a trustee to redress an injury sustained by, or to enforce a duty owed to, the beneficial owner if the beneficial owner can prevail without showing an injury or breach of duty to the trust.

A beneficial owner may maintain a derivative action to redress an injury sustained by or enforce a duty owed to a statutory trust if:

The beneficial owner first makes a demand on the trustees, requesting that the trustees cause the trust to bring an action to redress the injury or enforce the right, and the trustees do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

A demand would be futile.

A derivative action on behalf of a statutory trust may be maintained only by a person that is a beneficial owner at the time the action is commenced and who:

Was a beneficial owner when the conduct giving rise to the action occurred; or

Acquired the status as a beneficial owner by operation of law or pursuant to the terms of the governing instrument from a person that was a beneficial owner at the time of the conduct giving rise to the action occurred.

In a derivative action on behalf of the statutory trust, the complaint must state with particularity:

The date and content of the plaintiff’s demand and the trustees’ response to the demand; or

The reason the demand should be excused as futile.

The derivative proceeding shall not be maintained if:

It appears that the person commencing the proceeding does not fairly and adequately represent the interests of the beneficial owners in enforcing the rights of the statutory trust; or

The person commencing the proceeding ceases to be a beneficial owner in the statutory trust.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (10) of this section:

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action on behalf of a statutory trust, whether by judgment, compromise or settlement, are the property of the trust and not of the plaintiff; and

If the plaintiff receives any proceeds or other benefits, the plaintiff shall immediately remit them to the trust.

A derivative action on behalf of a statutory trust may not be voluntarily dismissed or settled without the court’s approval.

The proper venue for a direct action under subsection (1) of this section or a derivative action in which the action is brought solely against one (1) or more trustees shall be an appropriate court.

A beneficial owner associated with a series, if the series may pursuant to KRS

386A.4-010

(4) be sued in its own name, may bring an action pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section against only that series, the trustees associated with the series, or both. If brought only against a series or the trustees associated with the series, any demand made pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section shall be upon the trustees associated with the series.

On termination of the proceeding brought pursuant to this section, the court may:

Require the plaintiff to pay any defendant’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in defending the proceeding to the extent it finds that the proceeding or any portion thereof was commenced without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose; and

Require the statutory trust, or as appropriate a series thereof, to pay the plaintiff’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding has resulted in a substantial benefit to the statutory trust or to a series thereof.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 81, § 55, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 193, § 23, effective June 29, 2017.